Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LIBERTY PARK BAND SHELL.new text end new text begin $795,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Marshall to replace the historic band shell in Liberty Park. The city must provide $100,000 toward the total cost of the project. new text end